Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.975

State law enforcement mobilization—Development of reimbursement procedures—Eligibility of nonhost law enforcement authority for reimbursement.

The state patrol in consultation with the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs and the office of financial management shall develop procedures to facilitate reimbursement to jurisdictions from funds appropriated specifically for this purpose when jurisdictions are mobilized under the Washington state law enforcement mobilization plan.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed or interpreted to limit the eligibility of any nonhost law enforcement authority for reimbursement of expenses incurred in providing law enforcement resources for mobilization.

[ 2003 c 405 s 11.]